Nebraska, session 109, LB288.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 13-3202, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-3202 The Legislature finds that:
(1) Energy efficiency, grid resiliency, and the use of renewable energy
are important for preserving the health and economic well-being of Nebraska’s
citizens. Using less energy decreases the cost of living and keeps the cost of
public power low by delaying the need for additional power plants. By building
the market for energy efficiency, grid resiliency, and renewable energy
products, economic development will be encouraged and new jobs will be created
for Nebraskans in the energy efficiency, grid resiliency, and renewable energy
job sectors;
(2) To further these goals, the state should promote energy efficiency
improvements, grid resiliency improvements, and renewable energy systems;
(3) The upfront costs for energy efficiency improvements, grid resiliency
improvements, and renewable energy systems prohibit many property owners from
making improvements. Therefore, it is necessary to authorize municipalities to
implement an alternative financing method through the creation of clean energy
assessment districts; and
(4) Public purposes will be served by providing municipalities with the
authority to finance the installation of energy efficiency improvements, grid
resiliency improvements, and renewable energy systems through the creation of
clean energy assessment districts. Such public purposes include, but are not
limited to, reduced energy and water costs, reduced greenhouse gas emissions,
economic stimulation and development, improved property valuation, and
increased employment.
Sec. 2. Section 13-3203, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
13-3203 For purposes of the Property Assessed Clean Energy Act:
(1) Assessment contract means a contract entered into between a
municipality, a property owner, and, if applicable, a third-party lender under
which the municipality agrees to provide financing for an energy project in
exchange for a property owner’s agreement to pay an annual assessment for a
period not to exceed the weighted average useful life of the energy project;
(2) Clean energy assessment district means a district created by a
municipality to provide financing for energy projects;
(3) Energy efficiency improvement means any acquisition, installation, or
modification benefiting publicly or privately owned property that is designed
to reduce the electric, gas, water, or other utility demand or consumption of
the buildings on, or to be constructed on, such property or to promote the
efficient and effective management of natural resources or storm water,
including, but not limited to:
(a) Insulation in walls, roofs, floors, foundations, or heating and
cooling distribution systems;
(b) Storm windows and doors; multiglazed windows and doors; heat-absorbing
or heat-reflective glazed and coated window and door systems; and additional
glazing, reductions in glass area, and other window and door system
modifications that reduce energy consumption;
(c) Automated energy control systems;
(d) Heating, ventilating, or air conditioning and distribution system
modifications or replacements;
(e) Caulking, weatherstripping, and air sealing;
(f) Replacement or modification of lighting fixtures to reduce the energy
use of the lighting system;
(g) Energy recovery systems, including, but not limited to, cogeneration
and trigeneration systems;
-1-

LB288 LB288
2025 2025
(h) Daylighting systems;
(i) Installation or upgrade of electrical wiring or outlets to charge a
motor vehicle that is fully or partially powered by electricity;
(j) Facilities providing for water conservation or pollutant control;
(k) Roofs designed to reduce energy consumption or support additional
loads necessitated by other energy efficiency improvements;
(l) Installation of energy-efficient fixtures, including, but not limited
to, water heating systems, escalators, and elevators;
(m) Energy efficiency related items if so long as the cost of the energy
efficiency related items financed by the municipality does not exceed twenty-
five percent of the total cost of the energy project; and
(n) Any other installation or modification of equipment, devices, or
materials approved as a utility cost-saving measure by the municipality;
(4) Energy efficiency related item means any repair, replacement,
improvement, or modification to real property that is necessary or desirable in
conjunction with an energy efficiency improvement, including, but not limited
to, structural support improvements and the repair or replacement of any
building components, paved surfaces, or fixtures disrupted or altered by the
installation of an energy efficiency improvement;
(5) Energy project means the installation or modification of an energy
efficiency improvement or grid resiliency improvement or the acquisition,
installation, or improvement of a renewable energy system;
(6) Grid resiliency improvement means any acquisition, installation, or
modification benefiting publicly or privately owned property that is designed
to anticipate, prepare for, withstand, respond to, and rapidly recover from
major power disruptions, including, but not limited to:
(a) Backup power generators;
(b) Backup power generators powered by renewable energy resources;
(c) Solar panels with battery storage; and
(d) Smart grid technology;
(7) (6) Municipality means any county, city, or village in this state;
(8) (7) Qualifying property means any of the following types of property
located within a municipality:
(a) Agricultural property;
(b) Commercial property, including multifamily residential property
comprised of more than four dwelling units;
(c) Industrial property; or
(d) Single-family residential property, which may include up to four
dwelling units;
(9)(a) (8)(a) Renewable energy resource means a resource that naturally
replenishes over time and that minimizes the output of toxic material in the
conversion to energy. Renewable energy resource includes, but is not limited
to, the following:
(i) Nonhazardous biomass;
(ii) Solar and solar thermal energy;
(iii) Wind energy;
(iv) Geothermal energy;
(v) Methane gas captured from a landfill or elsewhere; and
(vi) Photovoltaic systems; and
(b) Renewable energy resource does not include petroleum, nuclear power,
natural gas, coal, or hazardous biomass; and
(10) (9) Renewable energy system means a fixture, product, device, or
interacting group of fixtures, products, or devices on the customer's side of
the meter that uses one or more renewable energy resources to generate
electricity. Renewable energy system includes a biomass stove but does not
include an incinerator.
Sec. 3. Section 13-3204, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
13-3204 (1) Pursuant to the procedures provided in this section, a
municipality may, from time to time, create one or more clean energy assessment
districts. Such districts may be separate, overlapping, or coterminous and may
be created anywhere within the municipality or its extraterritorial zoning
jurisdiction, except that a county shall not create a district that includes
any area within the corporate boundaries or extraterritorial zoning
jurisdiction of any city or village located in whole or in part within such
county. The governing body of the municipality shall be the governing body for
any district so created.
(2) Prior to creating any clean energy assessment district, the
municipality shall hold a public hearing at which the public may comment on the
creation of such district. Notice of the public hearing shall be given by
publication in a legal newspaper in, or of, general circulation in the
municipality at least ten days prior to the hearing.
(3) After the public hearing, the municipality may create a clean energy
assessment district by ordinance or, for counties, by resolution. The ordinance
or resolution shall include:
(a) A finding that the financing of energy projects is a valid public
purpose;
(b) A contract form to be used for assessment contracts between the
municipality, the owner of the qualifying property, and, if applicable, a
third-party lender governing the terms and conditions of financing and annual
assessments;
(c) Identification of an official authorized to enter into assessment
contracts on behalf of the municipality;
-2-

LB288 LB288
2025 2025
(d) An application process and eligibility requirements for financing
energy projects;
(e) An explanation of how annual assessments will be made and collected;
(f) For energy projects involving residential property, a requirement that
any interest rate on assessment installments must be a fixed rate;
(g) For energy projects involving residential property, a requirement that
the repayment period for assessments must be according to a fixed repayment
schedule;
(h) Information regarding the following, to the extent known, or
procedures to determine the following in the future:
(i) Provisions for an adequate debt service reserve fund created under
section 13-3209, if applicable;
(ii) Provisions for an adequate loss reserve fund created under section
13-3208; and
(iii) Any application, administration, or other program fees to be charged
to owners participating in the program that will be used to finance costs
incurred by the municipality as a result of the program;
(i) A requirement that the term of the annual assessments not exceed the
weighted average useful life of the energy project paid for by the annual
assessments;
(j) A requirement that any energy efficiency improvement that is not
permanently affixed to the qualifying property upon which an annual assessment
is imposed to repay the cost of such energy efficiency improvement shall must
be conveyed with the qualifying property if a transfer of ownership of the
qualifying property occurs;
(k) A requirement that, prior to the effective date of any contract that
binds the purchaser to purchase qualifying property upon which an annual
assessment is imposed, the owner shall provide notice to the purchaser that the
purchaser assumes responsibility for payment of the annual assessment as
provided in subdivision (3)(d) of section 13-3205;
(l) Provisions for marketing and participant education;
(m) A requirement that the municipality obtain verification that the
renewable energy system, grid resiliency improvement, or energy efficiency
improvement was properly installed and is operating as intended; and
(n) A requirement that the clean energy assessment district, with respect
to single-family residential property, comply with the Property Assessed Clean
Energy Act and with directives or guidelines issued by the Federal Housing
Administration and the Federal Housing Finance Agency on or after January 1,
2016, relating to property assessed clean energy financing.
Sec. 4. Section 18-2101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
18-2101 Sections 18-2101 to 18-2157 and section 8 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Community Development Law.
Sec. 5. Section 18-2101.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
18-2101.02 (1) For any city that (a) intends to carry out a redevelopment
project which will involve the construction of workforce housing in an
extremely blighted area as authorized under subdivision (28)(g) of section
18-2103, (b) intends to prepare a redevelopment plan that will divide ad
valorem taxes for a period of more than fifteen years but not more than twenty
years as provided in subdivision (4)(a) of section 18-2147, (b) (c) intends to
declare an area as an extremely blighted area for purposes of funding decisions
under subdivision (1)(b) of section 58-708, or (c) (d) intends to declare an
area as an extremely blighted area in order for individuals purchasing
residences in such area to qualify for the income tax credit authorized in
subsection (7) of section 77-2715.07, the governing body of such city shall
first declare, by resolution adopted after the public hearings required under
this section, such area to be an extremely blighted area.
(2) Prior to making such declaration, the governing body of the city shall
conduct or cause to be conducted a study or an analysis on whether the area is
extremely blighted and shall submit the question of whether such area is
extremely blighted to the planning commission or board of the city for its
review and recommendation. The planning commission or board shall hold a public
hearing on the question after giving notice of the hearing as provided in
section 18-2115.01. The planning commission or board shall submit its written
recommendations to the governing body of the city within thirty days after the
public hearing.
(3) Upon receipt of the recommendations of the planning commission or
board, or if no recommendations are received within thirty days after the
public hearing required under subsection (2) of this section, the governing
body shall hold a public hearing on the question of whether the area is
extremely blighted after giving notice of the hearing as provided in section
18-2115.01. At the public hearing, all interested parties shall be afforded a
reasonable opportunity to express their views respecting the proposed
declaration. After such hearing, the governing body of the city may make its
declaration.
(4) Copies of each study or analysis conducted pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section shall be posted on the city's public website or made available
for public inspection at a location designated by the city.
(5) The study or analysis required under subsection (2) of this section
may be conducted in conjunction with the study or analysis required under
section 18-2109. The hearings required under this section may be held in
conjunction with the hearings required under section 18-2109.
-3-

LB288 LB288
2025 2025
(6) Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Community Development Law,
the designation of an area as an extremely blighted area pursuant to this
section shall be valid for a period of no less than twenty-five years from the
effective date of the resolution declaring such area to be an extremely
blighted area, except that such designation may be removed prior to the end of
such period pursuant to section 18-2156.
Sec. 6. Section 18-2102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
18-2102 It is hereby found and declared that there exist in cities of all
classes and villages of this state areas which have deteriorated and become
substandard and blighted because of the unsafe, insanitary, inadequate, or
overcrowded condition of the dwellings therein, or because of inadequate
planning of the area, or excessive land coverage by the buildings thereon, or
the lack of proper light and air and open space, or because of the defective
design and arrangement of the buildings thereon, or faulty street or lot
layout, or congested traffic conditions, or economically or socially
undesirable land uses, or the lack of affordable housing in the area. Such
conditions or a combination of some or all of them have resulted and will
continue to result in making such areas economic or social liabilities harmful
to the social and economic well-being of the entire communities in which they
exist, needlessly increasing public expenditures, imposing onerous municipal
burdens, decreasing the tax base, reducing tax revenue, substantially impairing
or arresting the sound growth of municipalities, aggravating traffic problems,
substantially impairing or arresting the elimination of traffic hazards and the
improvement of traffic facilities, and depreciating general community-wide
values. The existence of such areas contributes substantially and increasingly
to the spread of disease and crime, necessitating excessive and
disproportionate expenditures of public funds for the preservation of the
public health and safety, for crime prevention, correction, prosecution,
punishment and the treatment of juvenile delinquency, and for the maintenance
of adequate police, fire, and accident protection and other public services and
facilities. These conditions are beyond remedy and control solely by regulatory
process in the exercise of the police power and cannot be dealt with
effectively by the ordinary operations of private enterprise without the aids
herein provided. The elimination of such conditions and the acquisition and
preparation of land in or necessary to the renewal of substandard and blighted
areas and its sale or lease for development or redevelopment in accordance with
general plans and redevelopment plans of communities and any assistance which
may be given by any state public body in connection therewith are public uses
and purposes for which public money may be expended and private property
acquired. The necessity in the public interest for the provisions of the
Community Development Law is hereby declared to be a matter of legislative
determination.
It is further found and declared that the prevention and elimination of
blight is a matter of state policy, public interest, and statewide concern and
within the powers and authority inhering in and reserved to the state, in order
that the state and its municipalities shall not continue to be endangered by
areas which are focal centers of disease, promote juvenile delinquency, and
consume an excessive proportion of their revenue.
It is further found and declared that certain substandard and blighted
areas, or portions thereof, may require acquisition, clearance, and
disposition, subject to use restrictions, as provided in the Community
Development Law, since the prevailing conditions of decay may make
impracticable the reclamation of the area by conservation or rehabilitation;
that other areas or portions thereof may, through the means provided in the
Community Development Law, be susceptible of conservation or rehabilitation in
such a manner that the conditions and evils, hereinbefore enumerated, may be
eliminated, remedied, or prevented; and that salvageable substandard and
blighted areas can be conserved and rehabilitated through appropriate public
action and the cooperation and voluntary action of the owners and tenants of
property in such areas.
Sec. 7. Section 18-2103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
18-2103 For purposes of the Community Development Law, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Affordable housing means (a) workforce housing, (b) housing targeted
for households earning less than one hundred fifty percent of the median income
for the county in which such housing is located, or (c) housing under section
42 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(2) (1) Area of operation means and includes the area within the corporate
limits of the city and such land outside the city as may come within the
purview of sections 18-2123 and 18-2123.01;
(3) (2) Authority means any community redevelopment authority created
pursuant to section 18-2102.01 and any community development agency created
pursuant to section 18-2101.01 and does not include a limited community
redevelopment authority;
(4) (3) Blighted area means an area (a) which, by reason of the presence
of a substantial number of deteriorated or deteriorating structures, existence
of defective or inadequate street layout, faulty lot layout in relation to
size, adequacy, accessibility, or usefulness, insanitary or unsafe conditions,
deterioration of site or other improvements, diversity of ownership, tax or
special assessment delinquency exceeding the fair value of the land, defective
or unusual conditions of title, improper subdivision, or obsolete or no
-4-

LB288 LB288
2025 2025
platting, or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by
fire and other causes, or any combination of such factors, substantially
impairs or arrests the sound growth of the community, retards the provision of
housing accommodations, or constitutes an economic or social liability and is
detrimental to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare in its present
condition and use and (b) in which there is at least one of the following
conditions: (i) Unemployment in the designated area is at least one hundred
twenty percent of the state or national average; (ii) the average age of the
residential or commercial units in the area is at least forty years; (iii) more
than half of the plotted and subdivided property in an area is unimproved land
that has been within the city for forty years and has remained unimproved
during that time; (iv) the per capita income of the area is lower than the
average per capita income of the city or village in which the area is
designated; or (v) the area has had either stable or decreasing population
based on the last two decennial censuses; or (vi) less than twenty percent of
the housing in the area is affordable housing. In no event shall a city of the
metropolitan, primary, or first class designate more than thirty-five percent
of the city as blighted, a city of the second class shall not designate an area
larger than fifty percent of the city as blighted, and a village shall not
designate an area larger than one hundred percent of the village as blighted. A
redevelopment project involving a formerly used defense site as authorized
under section 18-2123.01, any area which is located within a good life district
established under the Good Life Transformational Projects Act, and any area
declared to be an extremely blighted area under section 18-2101.02 shall not
count towards the percentage limitations contained in this subdivision;
(5) (4) Bonds means any bonds, including refunding bonds, notes, interim
certificates, debentures, or other obligations issued pursuant to the Community
Development Law except for bonds issued pursuant to section 18-2142.04;
(6) (5) Business means any private business located in an enhanced
employment area;
(7) (6) City means any city or incorporated village in the state;
(8) (7) Clerk means the clerk of the city or village;
(9) (8) Community redevelopment area means a substandard and blighted area
which the community redevelopment authority designates as appropriate for a
redevelopment project;
(10) (9) Employee means a person employed at a business as a result of a
redevelopment project;
(11) (10) Employer-provided health benefit means any item paid for by the
employer in total or in part that aids in the cost of health care services,
including, but not limited to, health insurance, health savings accounts, and
employer reimbursement of health care costs;
(12) (11) Enhanced employment area means an area not exceeding six hundred
acres (a) within a community redevelopment area which is designated by an
authority as eligible for the imposition of an occupation tax or (b) not within
a community redevelopment area as may be designated under section 18-2142.04;
(13) (12) Equivalent employees means the number of employees computed by
(a) dividing the total hours to be paid in a year by (b) the product of forty
times the number of weeks in a year;
(14) (13) Extremely blighted area means a substandard and blighted area in
which: (a) The average rate of unemployment in the area during the period
covered by the most recent federal decennial census or American Community
Survey 5-Year Estimate is at least two hundred percent of the average rate of
unemployment in the state during the same period; and (b) the average poverty
rate in the area exceeds twenty percent for the total federal census tract or
tracts or federal census block group or block groups in the area;
(15) (14) Federal government means the United States of America, or any
agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of
America;
(16) (15) Governing body or local governing body means the city council,
board of trustees, or other legislative body charged with governing the
municipality;
(17) (16) Limited community redevelopment authority means a community
redevelopment authority created pursuant to section 18-2102.01 having only one
single specific limited pilot project authorized;
(18) (17) Mayor means the mayor of the city or chairperson of the board of
trustees of the village;
(19) (18) New investment means the value of improvements to real estate
made in an enhanced employment area by a developer or a business;
(20) (19) Number of new employees means the number of equivalent employees
that are employed at a business as a result of the redevelopment project during
a year that are in excess of the number of equivalent employees during the year
immediately prior to the year that a redevelopment plan is adopted;
(21) (20) Obligee means any bondholder, agent, or trustee for any
bondholder, or lessor demising to any authority, established pursuant to
section 18-2102.01, property used in connection with a redevelopment project,
or any assignee or assignees of such lessor's interest or any part thereof, and
the federal government when it is a party to any contract with such authority;
(22) (21) Occupation tax means a tax imposed under section 18-2142.02;
(23) (22) Person means any individual, firm, partnership, limited
liability company, corporation, company, association, joint-stock association,
or body politic and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other similar
representative thereof;
(24) (23) Public body means the state or any municipality, county,
-5-

LB288 LB288
2025 2025
township, board, commission, authority, district, or other political
subdivision or public body of the state;
(25) (24) Real property means all lands, including improvements and
fixtures thereon, and property of any nature appurtenant thereto, or used in
connection therewith, and every estate, interest and right, legal or equitable,
therein, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage, or
otherwise, and the indebtedness secured by such liens;
(26) (25) Redeveloper means any person, partnership, or public or private
corporation or agency which enters or proposes to enter into a redevelopment
contract;
(27) (26) Redevelopment contract means a contract entered into between an
authority and a redeveloper for the redevelopment of an area in conformity with
a redevelopment plan;
(28) (27) Redevelopment plan means a plan, as it exists from time to time
for one or more community redevelopment areas, or for a redevelopment project,
which (a) conforms to the general plan for the municipality as a whole and (b)
is sufficiently complete to indicate such land acquisition, demolition and
removal of structures, redevelopment, improvements, and rehabilitation as may
be proposed to be carried out in the community redevelopment area, zoning and
planning changes, if any, land uses, maximum densities, and building
requirements;
(29) (28) Redevelopment project means any work or undertaking in one or
more community redevelopment areas: (a) To acquire substandard and blighted
areas or portions thereof, including lands, structures, or improvements the
acquisition of which is necessary or incidental to the proper clearance,
development, or redevelopment of such substandard and blighted areas; (b) to
clear any such areas by demolition or removal of existing buildings,
structures, streets, utilities, or other improvements thereon and to install,
construct, or reconstruct streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, public
spaces, public parking facilities, sidewalks or moving sidewalks, convention
and civic centers, bus stop shelters, lighting, benches or other similar
furniture, trash receptacles, shelters, skywalks and pedestrian and vehicular
overpasses and underpasses, enhancements to structures in the redevelopment
plan area which exceed minimum building and design standards in the community
and prevent the recurrence of substandard and blighted conditions, and any
other necessary public improvements essential to the preparation of sites for
uses in accordance with a redevelopment plan; (c) to sell, lease, or otherwise
make available land in such areas for residential, recreational, commercial,
industrial, or other uses, including parking or other facilities functionally
related or subordinate to such uses, or for public use or to retain such land
for public use, in accordance with a redevelopment plan; and may also include
the preparation of the redevelopment plan, the planning, survey, and other work
incident to a redevelopment project and the preparation of all plans and
arrangements for carrying out a redevelopment project; (d) to dispose of all
real and personal property or any interest in such property, or assets, cash,
or other funds held or used in connection with residential, recreational,
commercial, industrial, or other uses, including parking or other facilities
functionally related or subordinate to such uses, or any public use specified
in a redevelopment plan or project, except that such disposition shall be at
its fair value for uses in accordance with the redevelopment plan; (e) to
acquire real property in a community redevelopment area which, under the
redevelopment plan, is to be repaired or rehabilitated for dwelling use or
related facilities, repair or rehabilitate the structures, and resell the
property; (f) to carry out plans for a program of voluntary or compulsory
repair, rehabilitation, or demolition of buildings in accordance with the
redevelopment plan; and (g) in a rural community or in an extremely blighted
area within a municipality that is not a rural community, to carry out
construction of affordable workforce housing;
(30) (29) Redevelopment project valuation means the valuation for
assessment of the taxable real property in a redevelopment project last
certified for the year prior to the effective date of the provision authorized
in section 18-2147;
(31) (30) Rural community means any municipality in a county with a
population of fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the
most recent federal decennial census;
(32) (31) Substandard area means an area in which less than twenty percent
of the housing is affordable housing or in which there is a predominance of
buildings or improvements, whether nonresidential or residential in character,
which, by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, age or obsolescence,
inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air, sanitation, or open spaces,
high density of population and overcrowding, or the existence of conditions
which endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any combination of
such factors, is conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant
mortality, juvenile delinquency, and crime, (which cannot be remedied through
construction of prisons), and is detrimental to the public health, safety,
morals, or welfare; and
(33) (32) Workforce housing means:
(a) Housing that meets the needs of today's working families;
(b) Housing that is attractive to new residents considering relocation to
a rural community;
(c) Owner-occupied housing units that cost not more than two hundred
seventy-five thousand dollars to construct or rental housing units that cost
not more than two hundred thousand dollars per unit to construct. For purposes
-6-

LB288 LB288
2025 2025
of this subdivision (c), housing unit costs shall be updated annually by the
Department of Economic Development based upon the most recent increase or
decrease in the Producer Price Index for all commodities, published by the
United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics;
(d) Owner-occupied and rental housing units for which the cost to
substantially rehabilitate exceeds fifty percent of a unit's assessed value;
and
(e) Upper-story housing.
Sec. 8. For any proposed redevelopment project that includes the division
of taxes as provided in section 18-2147 and that is located in an area which
has been declared substandard and blighted because less than twenty percent of
the housing in the area is affordable housing, the governing body may approve
such project if:
(1) The project includes the construction of residential housing; and
(2) The governing body finds that, upon completion of the project, at
least thirty percent of the residential housing in such area will be affordable
housing.
Sec. 9. Section 58-701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
58-701 Sections 58-701 to 58-711 and section 10 of this act shall be known
and may be cited as the Nebraska Affordable Housing Act.
Sec. 10. The Department of Economic Development shall not require any new
construction project or rental conversion project which receives funding from
the Affordable Housing Trust Fund to meet the requirements of section 72-805
related to complying with the International Energy Conservation Code and
obtaining approval of building plans and specifications by the Department of
Environment and Energy.
Sec. 11. Section 58-708, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
58-708 (1) During each calendar year in which funds are available from the
Affordable Housing Trust Fund for use by the Department of Economic
Development, the department shall make its best efforts to allocate not less
than thirty percent of such funds to each congressional district. The
department shall announce a grant and loan application period of at least
ninety days duration for all projects. Before a grant application for any new
construction project can be submitted to the department, the land for the
project shall be identified. In selecting projects to receive trust fund
assistance, the department shall develop a qualified allocation plan and give
first priority to financially viable projects that serve the lowest income
occupants for the longest period of time. The qualified allocation plan shall:
(a) Set forth selection criteria to be used to determine housing
priorities of the housing trust fund which are appropriate to local conditions,
including the community's immediate need for affordable housing, proposed
increases in home ownership, private dollars leveraged, level of local
government support and participation, and repayment, in part or in whole, of
financial assistance awarded by the fund; and
(b) Give first priority in allocating trust fund assistance among selected
projects to those projects which are located in whole or in part within an
enterprise zone designated pursuant to the Enterprise Zone Act or an
opportunity zone designated pursuant to the federal Tax Cuts and Jobs Act,
Public Law 115-97, serve the lowest income occupant, are located in an area
that has been declared an extremely blighted area under section 18-2101.02, and
are obligated to serve qualified occupants for the longest period of time.
(2) Beginning on July 1, 2026:
(a) The Department of Economic Development shall disburse grant funds to a
qualified recipient equal to eighty percent of the housing development costs of
such recipient, excluding general administration costs, housing management
fees, lead-based paint test costs, and technical assistance costs, once the
department approves such recipient for grant funds; and
(b) The department shall disburse grant funds to a qualified recipient
equal to twenty percent of the housing development costs of such recipient,
excluding general administration costs, housing management fees, lead-based
paint test costs, and technical assistance costs, upon the completion of the
project.
(3)(a) Beginning on the operative date of this section, a qualified
recipient shall submit to the Department of Economic Development a schedule of
uses of funds for eligible activities on a quarterly basis, no later than
thirty days after the end of each calendar quarter, during the time of
performance under the award agreement.
(b) The schedule of uses of funds for eligible activities shall include an
itemization of costs for eligible activities. If reasonable, the department may
require source documentation and proof of payment, including, but not limited
to, a paid invoice, completed payment, or cleared check, to be submitted with
the schedule as evidence of appropriate use of funds. Qualified recipients
shall ensure proper use of funds. The department is not responsible for the
audit or approval of each of the qualified recipient's transactions involving
funds.
(c) The department may initiate any of the following actions if a
qualified recipient does not submit a schedule of uses of funds for eligible
activities:
(i) Disqualification of the qualified recipient in pending applications
for the Affordable Housing Trust Fund;
(ii) Disqualification of the qualified recipient in pending applications
-7-

LB288 LB288
2025 2025
for other department programs;
(iii) Disqualification of the qualified recipient as an eligible applicant
for Affordable Housing Trust Fund applications for up to twenty-four months
from the date of the department action; or
(iv) Other actions deemed necessary by the department to meet the
department's responsibility to ensure proper use of funds so long as such
actions do not unduly harm a qualified recipient's reputation and ability to
successfully operate in Nebraska. This subdivision does not prohibit the
department from taking appropriate actions against qualified recipients that
have committed illegal actions, such as fraud and theft.
(4) (2) The Department of Economic Development department shall fund in
order of priority as many applications as will utilize available funds less
actual administrative costs of the department in administering the program. In
administering the program the department may contract for services or directly
provide funds to other governmental entities or instrumentalities.
(5)(a) (3) The Department of Economic Development department may recapture
any funds which were allocated to a qualified recipient for an eligible project
through an award agreement if such funds were not utilized for eligible costs
within the time of performance under the agreement and are therefor no longer
obligated to the project.
(b) Upon completion of a project, the department shall recapture a
percentage of the funds which were allocated to a qualified recipient for an
eligible project through an award agreement equal to the percentage of the
housing development the qualified recipient agreed to construct under the award
agreement but failed to complete. Any funds recaptured under this subdivision
shall be credited to the Affordable Housing Trust Fund.
(c) A qualified recipient shall recapture any funds allocated to such
recipient from the Affordable Housing Trust Fund that are provided to a
homebuyer by the recipient as financial assistance for the purchase of a home
upon sale of such home from the net proceeds of such sale, if any.
The recaptured funds shall be credited to the Affordable Housing Trust
Fund.
Sec. 12. Section 58-711, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
58-711 (1) The Department of Economic Development shall submit, as part of
the department's annual status report under section 81-1201.11, the following
information regarding the Affordable Housing Trust Fund: (a) The applications
funded during the previous calendar year; (b) the applications funded in
previous years; (c) the identity of the organizations receiving funds; (d) the
location of each project; (e) the amount of funding provided to each project;
(f) the amount of funding leveraged as a result of each project; (g) the number
of units of housing created by each project and the occupancy rate; (h) the
expected cost of rent or monthly payment of those units; (i) the projected
number of new employees and community investment as a result of each project;
(j) the amount of revenue deposited into the Affordable Housing Trust Fund
pursuant to section 76-903; (k) the total amount of funds for which
applications were received during the previous calendar year, the year-end fund
balance, and, if all available funds have not been committed, an explanation of
the reasons why all such funds have not been so committed; (l) the amount of
appropriated funds actually expended by the department for the previous
calendar year; (m) the department's current budget for administration of the
Nebraska Affordable Housing Act and the department's planned use and
distribution of funds , including details on the amount of funds to be expended
on projects and the amount of funds to be expended by the department for
administrative purposes; and (n) project summaries, including the applicant
municipality, project description, and grant amount requested , amount and type
of matching funds, and reasons for approval or denial for every application
seeking funds during the previous calendar year.
(2) The status report shall contain no information that is protected by
state or federal confidentiality laws.
Sec. 13. Section 72-805, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
72-805 Except as provided in section 10 of this act for certain projects
funded by the Affordable Housing Trust Fund, the The 2018 International Energy
Conservation Code, published by the International Code Council, applies to all
new buildings constructed in whole or in part with state funds after July 1,
2020. The Department of Environment and Energy shall review building plans and
specifications necessary to determine whether a building will meet the
requirements of this section, except that the department shall not be required
to review building plans and specifications upon evidence that the building
plans and specifications have previously been reviewed by a county, city, or
village enforcing a local building or construction code adopted pursuant to
section 71-6406 if such local building or construction code includes the
requirements of the 2018 International Energy Conservation Code. The department
shall provide a copy of any its review to the agency receiving funding. The
agency receiving the funding shall verify that the building as constructed
meets or exceeds the code. The verification shall be provided to the
department. The Director of Environment and Energy may, in consultation with
the State Building Administrator of the Department of Administrative Services,
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 14. Section 81-1237, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-1237 For purposes of the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment
-8-

LB288 LB288
2025 2025
Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Economic Development;
(2) Director means the Director of Economic Development;
(3) Eligible activities of a workforce housing investment fund means:
(a) New construction of owner-occupied or rent-to-own housing in a
neighborhood and community with a demonstrated need for housing that is
affordable and attractive to first-time homebuyers, middle-income families, and
the emerging workforce;
(b) Substantial repair or rehabilitation of dilapidated housing stock; or
(c) Upper-story housing development for occupation by a homeowner or rent-
to-own tenant;
(4) HOME funds means funds awarded as formula grants under the HOME
Investment Partnerships Program administered by the United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development;
(5) Homeownership incentive reserve account means an interest-bearing,
deposit-insured account maintained by the owner of a housing unit for future
use by the unit's tenant to purchase a home;
(6) (5) Matching funds means dollars contributed by individuals,
businesses, foundations, local and regional political subdivisions, or other
nonprofit organizations to a workforce housing investment fund administered by
a nonprofit development organization;
(7) (6) Nonprofit development organization means a regional or statewide
nonprofit development organization approved by the director;
(8) Owner means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in whom is
vested all or part of the legal title to, or beneficial ownership of, the
subject housing unit;
(9) Project reserve account means an interest-bearing, deposit-insured
account maintained by the owner of a housing unit for unexpected expenses,
routine maintenance, and other operational costs associated with managing
rental properties;
(10) (7) Qualified activities include purchase guarantees, loan
guarantees, loan participations, and other credit enhancements related to
eligible activities of the workforce housing investment fund;
(11) (8) Qualified investment means a cash investment in a workforce
housing investment fund administered by a nonprofit development organization;
(12) Rent-to-own housing means housing units that:
(a) Are located within a development of single-family housing, duplexes,
townhouses, or multifamily housing in which there are no more than ten units on
a parcel of land; and
(b) Meet the following requirements until the housing unit is owner
occupied:
(i) The housing unit is occupied by a tenant as the tenant's primary
residence;
(ii) The tenant does not own a home or other residential real estate;
(iii) The lease for the housing unit provides that:
(A) Not less than fifty dollars of the tenant's monthly rent shall be set
aside in a homeownership incentive reserve account prior to any cash flow
distributions to the owner. Such homeownership incentive reserve account shall
be maintained by the owner in an interest-bearing account as long as the tenant
resides in the unit. When the lease ends, the owner shall liquidate the
homeownership incentive reserve account and distribute the money to the tenant
for downpayment and closing costs on the purchase of a home that will be the
tenant's new primary residence. If the tenant does not purchase a home at the
end of the lease, the money in the homeownership incentive reserve account
shall be transferred to a project reserve account; and
(B) The tenant may end the lease without penalty if the tenant provides
the owner with thirty days' written notice and purchases a home that will be
the tenant's new primary residence; and
(iv) The housing unit is the subject of a legally binding agreement
granting the tenant the option to purchase the unit from the owner at fair
market value not less than one year after the lease begins. Such agreement
shall give the tenant the ability to apply homeownership incentive reserve
account funds to downpayment and closing costs;
(13) (9) Urban community means any area that is:
(a)(i) In a county with a population greater than one hundred thousand
inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census; and
(ii) Within or adjacent to a qualified census tract as described in 26
U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B), as such section existed on January 1, 2022;
(b) Within a city of the primary class or within a county in which a city
of the primary class is located; or
(c) In a county with a population greater than one hundred thousand
inhabitants, as determined by the most recent federal decennial census, that
does not contain a city of the metropolitan class or a city of the primary
class;
(14) (10) Workforce housing means:
(a) Owner-occupied or rent-to-own housing units that have an after-
construction appraised value of at least one hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars but not more than three hundred thirty thousand dollars cost not more
than three hundred thirty thousand dollars to construct. For purposes of this
subdivision, housing unit after-construction appraised value costs shall be
updated annually by the department based upon the most recent increase or
decrease in the Producer Price Index for all commodities, published by the
United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics;
-9-

LB288 LB288
2025 2025
(b) Owner-occupied or rent-to-own housing that meets the following
requirements: units for which the
(i) The cost to substantially rehabilitate such housing units exceeds
fifty percent of its a unit's before-construction assessed value; and , and the
(ii) The after-construction appraised value of the building alone is at
least one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars but not more than two hundred
seventy-five thousand dollars. For purposes of this subdivision, housing unit
after-construction appraised value shall be updated annually by the department
based upon the most recent increase or decrease in the Producer Price Index for
all commodities, published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of
Labor Statistics;
(c) Upper-story housing for occupation by a homeowner or rent-to-own
tenant; and
(d) Housing units that do that does not receive federal or state low-
income housing tax credits, community development block grants, HOME funds, or
funds from the Affordable Housing Trust Fund. Notwithstanding the foregoing,
the department shall not restrict the construction of housing units on land
parcels prepared using funds from the sources described in this subdivision and
shall not restrict the sale of housing units to homebuyers that receive
homebuyer assistance funds from the sources described in this subdivision; and
(15) (11) Workforce housing investment fund means a fund that has been
created by a nonprofit development organization and certified by the director
to encourage development of workforce housing in urban communities.
Sec. 15. Section 81-1238, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-1238 (1) The director shall establish a workforce housing investment
grant program to foster and support the development of workforce housing in
urban communities.
(2) A nonprofit development organization may apply to the director for
approval of a workforce housing grant for a workforce housing investment fund.
The application shall be in a form and manner prescribed by the director.
Through fiscal year 2026-27, grants shall be awarded by the director on a
competitive basis until grant funds are no longer available. Grant maximums
shall not exceed ten million dollars to any one nonprofit development
organization over a two-year period, with the cumulative amount for any single
grantee to be determined by the department at the discretion of the director.
An applicant shall provide matching funds for workforce housing grant funds
awarded. For grant funds awarded prior to July 19, 2024, an applicant shall
provide matching funds of at least fifty percent of the amount of such grant
funds awarded. For grant funds awarded on or after July 19, 2024, an applicant
shall provide matching funds of at a least twenty-five percent of the amount of
such grant funds awarded. Unallocated funds held by the department shall be
rolled to the next program year.
(3) Grants shall be awarded based upon:
(a) A demonstrated need for additional owner-occupied housing. Need can be
demonstrated with a recent housing study or a letter from the planning
department of the city in which the fund is intending to operate stating that
the proposal is in line with the city's most recent consolidated plan submitted
under 24 C.F.R. part 91, subpart D, as such subpart existed on January 1, 2020;
(b) A neighborhood or community that has a higher-than-state-average
unemployment rate;
(c) A neighborhood or community that exhibits a demonstrated commitment to
growing its housing stock;
(d) Reducing barriers to the development and purchase of owner-occupied
housing with flexible forms of assistance, including grants, forgivable loans,
homeownership incentive reserve accounts, purchase option agreements, and other
forms of long-term, patient financing;
(e) Projects that can reasonably be ready for occupancy in a period of
twenty-four months; and
(f) A demonstrated ability to grow and manage a workforce housing
investment fund.
(4) A workforce housing investment fund shall:
(a) Be required to receive annual certification from the department;
(b) Invest or intend to invest in eligible activities for a workforce
housing investment fund;
(c) Use any fees, interest, loan repayments, or other funds received by
the nonprofit development organization as a result of the administration of the
grant to support qualified activities; and
(d) Have an active board of directors with expertise in development,
construction, and finance that meets at least quarterly to approve all
qualified investments made by the nonprofit development organization. A
nonprofit development organization shall have a formal plan and proven
expertise to invest unused workforce housing investment fund balances and shall
conduct an annual audit of all financial records by an independent certified
public accountant.
(5) A nonprofit development organization that has previously received a
grant or grants under the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Act shall
not be eligible for an additional grant under this section unless the
organization has expended at least fifty percent of the funds from such
previous grant or grants.
Sec. 16. Section 81-1239, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-1239 (1) The Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund is
-10-

LB288 LB288
2025 2025
created. Funding for the grant program described in section 81-1238 shall come
from the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund. The Middle Income
Workforce Housing Investment Fund may include revenue transferred at the
direction of from appropriations from the Legislature, grants, private
contributions, and other sources. Any money in the Middle Income Workforce
Housing Investment Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The department shall establish a subaccount within the Middle Income
Workforce Housing Investment Fund that shall be used to fund affordable housing
and related land parcel preparation activities under the Economic Recovery Act
as described in subdivisions (4)(d) and (e) of section 81-12,241.
(3) The department shall administer the Middle Income Workforce Housing
Investment Fund and may seek additional private or nonstate funds to use in the
grant program under the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Act,
including, but not limited to, contributions from the Nebraska Investment
Finance Authority and other interested parties.
(4) Interest earned by the department on grant funds shall be applied to
the grant program.
(5) If a nonprofit development organization, or a recipient of subaccount
funds described in subsection (2) of this section, fails to engage in a
qualified activity within twenty-four months after receiving initial grant
funding, the nonprofit development organization or recipient of subaccount
funds shall return the grant proceeds to the department for credit to the
General Fund.
(6) Beginning July 1, 2029, any funds held by the department in the Middle
Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund shall be transferred to the General
Fund.
Sec. 17. Section 81-1240, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-1240 (1) Each nonprofit development organization shall submit an annual
report to the director to be included as a part of the department's annual
status report required under section 81-1201.11. The report shall certify that
the workforce housing investment fund meets the requirements of the Middle
Income Workforce Housing Investment Act and shall include a breakdown of
program activities.
(2) The annual report shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) The name and geographical location of the nonprofit development
organization;
(b) The number, amount, and type of workforce housing investment funds
invested in qualified activities;
(c) The number, geographical location, type, and amount of investments
made;
(d) A summary of matching funds and where such matching funds were
generated; and
(e) The results of the annual audit required under subdivision (4)(d) of
section 81-1238; and .
(f) The number of tenants assisted into homeownership, if applicable.
(3) If a nonprofit development organization ceases administration of a
workforce housing investment fund, it shall file a final report with the
director in a form and manner required by the director. Before July 1, 2029,
any unallocated workforce housing investment fund grant funds shall be returned
for credit to the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund. On and after
July 1, 2029, any unallocated workforce housing investment fund grant funds
shall be returned to the department for transfer to the General Fund.
(4) If a workforce housing investment fund fails to file a complete annual
report by February 15, the director may, in his or her discretion, impose a
civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars for such violation. All
money collected by the department pursuant to this subsection shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section
5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
(5) This section does not apply to the subaccount of the Middle Income
Workforce Housing Investment Fund described in subsection (2) of section
81-1239.
Sec. 18. Sections 11, 12, and 20 of this act become operative on October
1, 2025. The other sections of this act become operative on their effective
date.
Sec. 19. Original sections 13-3202, 13-3203, 13-3204, 18-2102, 58-701,
81-1237, 81-1238, 81-1239, and 81-1240, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
and sections 18-2101, 18-2101.02, 18-2103, and 72-805, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 20. Original sections 58-708 and 58-711, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, are repealed.
-11-